Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska11-125
Bonds; county officers; premium paid by county; conditions.

If any county treasurer, county attorney, clerk of the district court, county clerk, county judge, clerk magistrate, county assessor, register of deeds, county sheriff, county commissioner or supervisor, or acting officer who is appointed as provided by section 32-561 furnishes a bond executed by a surety company authorized by the laws of this state to execute such bond and such bond is approved by the county board, then the county may pay the premium for such bond. Any surety bond so executed and approved shall contain a covenant to the effect that when the stated term of the bond is reduced to a shorter term by reason of the death, resignation, or removal from office of such official for a cause not imposing liability on the bond, the obligor shall refund to the county the unearned portion of the premium so paid for the term of the bond subject to a reasonable minimum premium charge.

Laws 1905, c. 49, § 1, p. 294;

R.S.1913, § 5731;

C.S.1922, § 5060;

C.S.1929, § 12-124;

Laws 1935, c. 25, § 1, p. 118;

Laws 1941, c. 17, § 1, p. 101;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 12-124;

Laws 1943, c. 21, § 1(1), p. 112;

R.S.1943, § 11-125;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 94;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 467;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 2.

Elected county officials are required to give individual official bonds. Blanket bond is not sufficient. Foote v. County of Adams, 163 Neb. 406, 80 N.W.2d 179 (1956).

It is mandatory that county board pays premiums upon bonds of officers and employees designated, if and when bonds are approved. Douglas County v. Belitz, 142 Neb. 376, 6 N.W.2d 370 (1942).

The expense of county treasurer's bond legally executed by qualified bonding company as surety, approved and accepted by board, is a binding obligation of county. Haase v. Buffalo County, 86 Neb. 145, 124 N.W. 1130 (1910).